Utah statutes.
75-3-710.   Powers of personal representatives -- In general.

Until termination of his appointment a personal representative has the same power over the title to property of the estate that an absolute owner would have, in trust, however, for the benefit of the creditors and others interested in the estate. This power may be exercised without notice, hearing, or order of court, unless otherwise specifically provided by this code.



Amended by Chapter 226, 1983 General Session

